Nevada, session 83, SB172.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 1.3. Chapter 608 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
“Agricultural employee” means an employee who performs a
service or activity described in section 203(f) of the federal Fair
Labor Standards Act of 1938, 29 U.S.C. § 203(f).
Sec. 1.7. NRS 608.007 is hereby amended to read as follows:
608.007 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 608.009 to 608.0126,
inclusive, and section 1.3 of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
Sec. 2. NRS 608.019 is hereby amended to read as follows:
608.019 1. An employer shall not employ an employee for a
continuous period of 8 hours , or 5 hours for an agricultural
employee, without permitting the employee to have a meal period of
-
*SB172_R1*

– 3 –
at least one-half hour. No period of less than 30 minutes interrupts a
continuous period of work for the purposes of this subsection.
2. Every employer shall authorize and permit all his or her
employees to take rest periods, which, insofar as practicable, shall
be in the middle of each work period. The duration of the rest
periods shall be based on the total hours worked daily at the rate of
10 minutes for each 4 hours or major fraction thereof. Rest periods
need not be authorized however for employees whose total daily
work time is less than 3 and one-half hours. Authorized rest periods
shall be counted as hours worked, for which there shall be no
deduction from wages.
3. This section does not apply to:
(a) Situations where only one person is employed at a particular
place of employment.
(b) Employees included within the provisions of a collective
bargaining agreement.
4. An employer may apply to the Labor Commissioner for an
exemption from providing to all or to one or more defined
categories of his or her employees one or more of the benefits
conferred by this section. The Labor Commissioner may grant the
exemption if the Labor Commissioner believes the employer has
shown sufficient evidence that business necessity precludes
providing such benefits. Any exemption so granted shall apply to
members of either sex.
5. The Labor Commissioner may by regulation exempt a
defined category of employers from providing to all or to one or
more defined categories of their employees one or more of the
benefits conferred by this section, upon the Labor Commissioner’s
own motion or upon the application of an association of employers.
Each such application shall be considered at a hearing and may be
granted if the Labor Commissioner finds that business necessity
precludes providing that particular benefit or benefits to the
employees affected. Any exemption so granted shall apply to
members of either sex.
Sec. 3. NRS 608.154 is hereby amended to read as follows:
608.154 1. A part of wages or compensation may, if mutually
agreed upon by an employee and employer in the contract of
employment, consist of lodging.
2. In no case may the value of the lodging be computed at more
than five times the statutory minimum hourly wage for each week
that lodging is provided to the employee.
[2. The monetary limitations on the value of lodging specified
in subsection 1 do not apply to agricultural employees.]
-
*SB172_R1*

– 4 –
Sec. 4. NRS 608.155 is hereby amended to read as follows:
608.155 1. A part of wages or compensation may, if mutually
agreed upon by an employee and employer in the contract of
employment, consist of meals.
2. In no case shall the value of the meals be computed at more
than 100 percent of the statutory minimum hourly wage per day.
3. In no case shall the value of the meals consumed by such
employee be computed or valued at more than 25 percent of the
statutory minimum hourly wage for each breakfast actually
consumed, 25 percent of the statutory minimum hourly wage for
each lunch actually consumed, and 50 percent of the statutory
minimum hourly wage for each dinner actually consumed.
[2. The monetary limitations on the value of meals, contained
in subsection 1, do not apply to agricultural employees.]
Sec. 4.3. NRS 608.180 is hereby amended to read as follows:
608.180 The Labor Commissioner or the representative of the
Labor Commissioner shall cause the provisions of NRS 608.005 to
608.195, inclusive, and section 1.3 of this act, and 608.215 to be
enforced, and upon notice from the Labor Commissioner or the
representative:
1. The district attorney of any county in which a violation of
those sections has occurred;
2. The Deputy Labor Commissioner, as provided in
NRS 607.050;
3. The Attorney General, as provided in NRS 607.160 or
607.220; or
4. The special counsel, as provided in NRS 607.065,
 shall prosecute the action for enforcement according to law.
Sec. 4.7. NRS 608.195 is hereby amended to read as follows:
608.195 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 608.0165,
any person who violates any provision of NRS 608.005 to 608.195,
inclusive, and section 1.3 of this act, or 608.215, or any regulation
adopted pursuant thereto, is guilty of a misdemeanor.
2. In addition to any other remedy or penalty, the Labor
Commissioner may impose against the person an administrative
penalty of not more than $5,000 for each such violation.
Sec. 5. Chapter 613 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 6 to 21, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 6. Sections 6 to 21, inclusive, of this act may be cited as
the Agricultural Workers’ Bill of Rights.
Sec. 7. As used in sections 6 to 21, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 8, 9 and 10 of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
-
*SB172_R1*

– 5 –
Sec. 8. “Agricultural employer” means a person who
employs an agricultural worker.
Sec. 9. 1. “Agricultural worker” means a worker engaged
in a service or activity described in section 203(f) of the federal
Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, 29 U.S.C. § 203(f).
2. The term does not include a cannabis establishment agent
employed by a cannabis cultivation facility.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Cannabis cultivation facility” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 678A.090.
(b) “Cannabis establishment agent” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 678A.100.
Sec. 10. “Key service provider” means a service provider to
which an agricultural worker may need access, including, without
limitation:
1. A provider of health care, as defined in NRS 629.031;
2. A community health worker, as defined in NRS 449.0027.
3. A teacher.
4. An attorney licensed to practice in this State.
5. A public official.
6. A member of the clergy.
Sec. 11. If an agricultural employer provides housing to an
agricultural worker, the agricultural worker is entitled to
reasonable access for visitors at the housing and the agricultural
employer shall not interfere with the reasonable access when the
agricultural worker is present at the housing.
Sec. 12. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, an
agricultural worker is entitled to reasonable access to key service
providers at any time when the agricultural worker is not
performing compensable work or during periods of paid or unpaid
rest and meal breaks.
2. An agricultural worker is entitled to reasonable access to a
provider of health care, as defined in NRS 629.031, at any time
when the agricultural worker is performing compensable work or
during periods of paid or unpaid rest and meal breaks.
3. The Labor Commissioner may adopt regulations to require
periods of time in addition to those prescribed by subsections 1
and 2 in which an agricultural worker is entitled to access key
service providers.
Sec. 13. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, an
agricultural employer that provides housing and transportation
for an agricultural worker shall at least 1 day per week transport
the agricultural worker to a location where the agricultural
worker can access basic necessities, conduct financial transactions
and meet with key service providers, unless the agricultural
-
*SB172_R1*

– 6 –
worker is a range worker who is actively engaged in the
production of livestock on the open range, in which case, the
agricultural employer shall provide the transportation at least 1
day every 3 weeks.
2. If an agricultural worker has access to a personal vehicle
and is permitted to park the vehicle on the property of the
agricultural employer, the agricultural employer is not required to
provide the transportation described in subsection 1.
Sec. 14. 1. A person shall not prohibit, limit or interfere
with, or attempt to prohibit, limit or interfere with, the access to or
egress from the residence of an agricultural worker by:
(a) The erection or maintenance of a physical barrier;
(b) Any physical force or violence;
(c) Any threat of physical force or violence; or
(d) Any order or notice.
2. This section does not apply to the actions of an agricultural
worker which relate to the residence of the agricultural worker.
Sec. 15. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3
and 5, the use of a short-handed hoe is prohibited in agricultural
employment for weeding and thinning in a stooped, kneeling or
squatting position.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and 5, the
performance of weeding and thinning by hand or with a short-
handed tool, other than a short-handed hoe, in a stooped, kneeling
or squatting position is prohibited unless there is not a suitable
long-handed tool or other alternative means of performing the
work that is appropriate to both the production of the agricultural
or horticultural commodity and the scale of the operation.
3. The provisions of subsections 1 and 2 do not prohibit:
(a) Any occasional or intermittent weeding or thinning done
by hand in a stooped, kneeling or squatting position if it is
incidental to weeding or thinning using a tool;
(b) Any thinning done by hand of high-density plants spaced
less than 2 inches apart when planted;
(c) Any weeding or thinning done by hand of an agricultural
or horticultural commodity grown in fields or greenhouses for
which the agricultural employer is a certified producer or handler
of organic agricultural products;
(d) Any weeding, thinning or tending done by hand to an
agricultural or horticultural commodity when it is a seedling;
(e) Any weeding, thinning or tending done by hand to an
agricultural or horticultural commodity grown in a tub or planter
container with an opening that does not exceed 15 inches in
width;
-
*SB172_R1*

– 7 –
(f) Any seeding, planting, transplanting or harvesting done by
hand or with a tool; and
(g) Any weeding, thinning or tending done by hand to the soil-
exposed area immediately surrounding an agricultural or
horticultural commodity grown using polyethylene film or plastic
mulch, except as applied to the weeding by hand of the spaces
between the rows of plants grown using polyethylene film or
plastic mulch.
4. An agricultural employer shall provide gloves and knee
pads to each agricultural worker that is engaged in weeding or
thinning done by hand.
5. The Labor Commissioner shall adopt regulations to
establish:
(a) An exception to the prohibitions described in subsections 1
and 2 for an agricultural employer that is actively engaged in
obtaining a certificate to be producer or handler of organic
agricultural products; and
(b) A procedure for an agricultural employer to seek a waiver
that allows for occasional or intermittent weeding by hand of
agricultural or horticultural products if the agricultural employer
establishes that:
(1) The weeding does not involve prolonged and
unnecessary stooping, kneeling or squatting and does not create a
risk of acute, chronic or debilitating injuries for agricultural
workers;
(2) There is not a suitable long-handed tool or other
alternative means of performing the work that is appropriate to
both the production of the agricultural or horticultural commodity
and the scale of the operation; and
(3) The weeding by hand cannot be performed pursuant to
an exception described in subsection 3.
6. An agricultural employer shall increase a period of rest
prescribed by NRS 608.019 by 5 minutes if an agricultural worker
engages in weeding or thinning by hand during the applicable
period of work.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Agricultural employment” means employment in a service
or activity described in section 203(f) of the federal Fair Labor
Standards Act of 1938, 29 U.S.C. § 203(f).
(b) “Occasional or intermittent” means 20 percent or less of
the weekly work time of an agricultural worker.
(c) “Short-handed hoe” means a handheld tool with a flat
blade affixed perpendicularly to a handle that is less than 18
inches long. The term includes a long-handled hand tool that has
been modified to be used as a short-handed hoe.
-
*SB172_R1*

– 8 –
Sec. 16. 1. An agricultural employer shall post a notice of
the rights of an agricultural worker described in sections 11 to 15,
inclusive, of this act.
2. The notice described in subsection 1 must be posted:
(a) At the housing provided by the agricultural employer, if
applicable;
(b) In addition to any location described in paragraph (a), at a
conspicuous place on the premises of the agricultural employer;
(c) At each place where notices to employees are customarily
posted on the premises of the agricultural employer; and
(d) By electronic means, including, by electronic mail or
posted to the Internet website of an agricultural employer, if the
agricultural employer customarily communicates with an
agricultural worker by these means.
Sec. 17. 1. During the existence of a state of emergency or
declaration of disaster pursuant to NRS 414.070 related to public
health, an agricultural employer shall provide:
(a) Each agricultural worker who is living in a single-
occupancy unit of housing provided by the agricultural employer
at least 80 square feet of combined sleeping and living quarters;
(b) Each agricultural worker who is living in multiple-
occupancy housing of the agricultural employer at least 100
square feet of sleeping quarters per worker and 120 square feet of
space per worker in areas used for combined purposes such as
meal preparation and eating;
(c) Each agricultural worker engaged in open-range
production of livestock with a single-occupancy mobile housing
unit;
(d) In addition to any requirement under paragraph (a), (b) or
(c), each unit of housing provided by the agricultural employer
with screened windows that open to the outside or a living space
that has an air filtration system;
(e) Training to agricultural workers concerning safety
precautions and protections during emergencies and disasters
related to public health; and
(f) Informational and educational materials through posters
and pamphlets written in English and Spanish and any other
relevant languages in each unit of housing provided by the
agricultural employer, the premises of the agricultural employer
and other places where the agricultural employer posts notices for
employees.
2. The materials described in paragraph (f) of subsection 1
must include:
(a) The contact information for the Farmworker Law Program
of Nevada Legal Services, or its successor organization; and
-
*SB172_R1*

– 9 –
(b) Any guidance from federal and state authorities
concerning the emergency or declaration of disaster related to
public health.
3. The Department of Health and Human Services may
inspect the housing provided by the agricultural employer to
ensure compliance with this section during an emergency or
disaster related to public health.
Sec. 18. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 19. Agricultural workers have the right to self-
organization, to bargain directly for themselves, and to form and
join or assist labor organizations to bargain collectively through
representatives of their own free choosing, or to engage in lawful
concerted activity for the purpose of collective bargaining or other
mutual aid or protection, and each such agricultural worker has
the right, without interference from any source, to refrain from
any of these activities.
Sec. 20. 1. An agricultural worker may commence an
action in a court of competent jurisdiction against an agricultural
employer for a violation of sections 6 to 20, inclusive, of this act or
for retaliation against the agricultural worker for exercising a
right prescribed by sections 11 to 15, inclusive, of this act.
2. A whistleblower or key service provider who is unable to
access an agricultural worker because of a violation of sections 11
to 15, inclusive, of this act may commence an action in a court of
competent jurisdiction against an agricultural employer for a
violation of sections 11 to 15, inclusive, of this act.
3. If a court finds that an agricultural employer violated a
provision of sections 11 to 15, inclusive, of this act, the court may:
(a) Order injunctive relief;
(b) Award actual damages or $10,000, whichever is greater;
and
(c) Award reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.
4. Any amount recovered by a whistleblower or key service
provider pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 3 must be
distributed to the agricultural workers affected by the violation
who can be located by the whistleblower or key service provider.
5. As used in this section, “whistleblower” means a person
designated by an agricultural worker in a confidential, sealed
filing with the court.
Sec. 21. 1. The Advisory Committee on Agricultural Work
is hereby created in the Office of Labor Commissioner. The
Advisory Committee consists of nine voting members appointed as
follows:
(a) Two members who are agricultural workers, appointed by
the Labor Commissioner;
-
*SB172_R1*

– 10 –
(b) Two members who are advocates of agricultural workers,
appointed by the Labor Commissioner;
(c) Three members who represent agricultural employers,
appointed by the Director of the State Department of Agriculture;
and
(d) Two members from the Farmworker Law Program of
Nevada Legal Services, or its successor organization.
2. The term of office of each member appointed to the
Advisory Committee is 4 years.
3. A vacancy on the Advisory Committee must be filled in the
same manner as the original appointment by the appointing
authority for the remainder of the unexpired term.
4. Members of the Advisory Committee serve without
compensation.
5. The Advisory Committee shall:
(a) Gather and analyze data and other information regarding
the wages and working conditions of agricultural workers; and
(b) Submit an annual report on its findings to the Director of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmission to the
Legislature.
Sec. 22. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 23. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 22, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for purposes of adopting any
regulations or performing any other preparatory administrative tasks
that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB172_R1*